Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SPONGY MOTH MANAGEMENT.new text end new text begin $954,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $954,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of agriculture for the Slow the Spread program for monitoring, control, and treatment of spongy moth populations. new text end